Illinois, session 104th, HB5329.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Mental Health and Developmental 5Disabilities Code is amended by changing Sections 1-109, 61-129, 2-107, 2-107.1, 3-611, and 3-807 and by adding Section 71-103.5 as follows: 8    (405 ILCS 5/1-103.5 new)9    Sec. 1-103.5. Confinement. "Confinement", with respect to 10a mental health facility, means that an individual is 11prevented or otherwise not permitted to leave the facility. 12    (405 ILCS 5/1-109)  (from Ch. 91 1/2, par. 1-109)13    Sec. 1-109. "Discharge" means the full and physical 14release of any person admitted or otherwise detained under 15this Act from treatment, habilitation, or care and custody.16(Source: P.A. 80-1414.) 17    (405 ILCS 5/1-129)18    Sec. 1-129. Mental illness. "Mental illness" means a 19mental, or emotional disorder that substantially impairs a 20person's thought, perception of reality, emotional process, 21judgment, behavior, or ability to cope with the ordinary   HB5329 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 20662 KTG 34160 b1demands of life, but does not include a developmental 2disability, a neurocognitive disorder dementia or Alzheimer's 3disease absent psychosis, a substance use disorder, or an 4abnormality manifested only by repeated criminal or otherwise 5antisocial conduct.6(Source: P.A. 100-759, eff. 1-1-19.) 7    (405 ILCS 5/2-107)  (from Ch. 91 1/2, par. 2-107)8    Sec. 2-107. Refusal of services; informing of risks. 9    (a) An adult recipient of services or the recipient's 10guardian, if the recipient is under guardianship, and the 11recipient's substitute decision maker, if any, must be 12informed of the recipient's right to refuse medication or 13electroconvulsive therapy. The recipient and the recipient's 14guardian or substitute decision maker shall be given the 15opportunity to refuse generally accepted mental health or 16developmental disability services, including but not limited 17to medication or electroconvulsive therapy. If such services 18are refused, they shall not be given unless such services are 19necessary to prevent the recipient from causing serious and 20imminent physical harm to the recipient or others and no less 21restrictive alternative is available. The facility director 22shall inform a recipient, guardian, or substitute decision 23maker, if any, who refuses such services of alternate services 24available and the risks of such alternate services, as well as 25the possible consequences to the recipient of refusal of such   HB5329 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 20662 KTG 34160 b1services.2    (b) Psychotropic medication or electroconvulsive therapy 3may be administered under this Section for up to 24 hours only 4if the circumstances leading up to the need for emergency 5treatment are set forth in writing in the recipient's record.6    (c) Administration of medication or electroconvulsive 7therapy may not be continued unless the need for such 8treatment is redetermined at least every 24 hours based upon a 9personal examination of the recipient by a physician or a 10nurse under the supervision of a physician and the 11circumstances demonstrating that need are set forth in writing 12in the recipient's record.13    (d) Neither psychotropic medication nor electroconvulsive 14therapy may be administered under this Section for a period in 15excess of 72 hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and 16holidays, unless a petition is filed under Section 2-107.1 and 17the treatment continues to be necessary under subsection (a) 18of this Section. Once the petition has been filed, treatment 19may continue in compliance with subsections (a), (b), and (c) 20of this Section until the final outcome of the hearing on the 21petition.22    (e) The Department shall issue rules designed to ensure 23insure that in State-operated mental health facilities 24psychotropic medication and electroconvulsive therapy are 25administered in accordance with this Section and only when 26appropriately authorized and monitored by a physician or a   HB5329 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 20662 KTG 34160 b1nurse under the supervision of a physician in accordance with 2accepted medical practice. The facility director of each 3mental health facility not operated by the State shall issue 4rules designed to ensure insure that in that facility 5psychotropic medication and electroconvulsive therapy are 6administered in accordance with this Section and only when 7appropriately authorized and monitored by a physician or a 8nurse under the supervision of a physician in accordance with 9accepted medical practice. Such rules shall be available for 10public inspection and copying during normal business hours.11    (f) The provisions of this Section with respect to the 12emergency administration of psychotropic medication and 13electroconvulsive therapy do not apply to facilities licensed 14under the Nursing Home Care Act, the Specialized Mental Health 15Rehabilitation Act of 2013, the ID/DD Community Care Act, or 16the MC/DD Act.17    (g) Under no circumstances may long-acting psychotropic 18medications be administered under this Section.19    (h) Whenever psychotropic medication or electroconvulsive 20therapy is refused pursuant to subsection (a) of this Section 21at least once that day, the physician or advanced practice 22psychiatric nurse shall determine and state in writing the 23reasons why the recipient did not meet the criteria for 24administration of medication or electroconvulsive therapy 25under subsection (a) and whether the recipient meets the 26standard for administration of psychotropic medication or   HB5329 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 20662 KTG 34160 b1electroconvulsive therapy under Section 2-107.1 of this Code. 2If the physician or advanced practice psychiatric nurse 3determines that the recipient meets the standard for 4administration of psychotropic medication or electroconvulsive 5therapy under Section 2-107.1, the facility director or his or 6her designee shall petition the court for administration of 7psychotropic medication or electroconvulsive therapy pursuant 8to that Section unless the facility director or his or her 9designee states in writing in the recipient's record why the 10filing of such a petition is not warranted. This subsection 11(h) applies only to State-operated mental health facilities.12    (i) The Department shall conduct annual trainings for all 13physicians and registered nurses working in State-operated 14mental health facilities on the appropriate use of emergency 15administration of psychotropic medication and 16electroconvulsive therapy, standards for their use, and the 17methods of authorization under this Section. 18(Source: P.A. 98-104, eff. 7-22-13; 99-180, eff. 7-29-15.) 19    (405 ILCS 5/2-107.1)  (from Ch. 91 1/2, par. 2-107.1)20    Sec. 2-107.1. Administration of psychotropic medication 21and electroconvulsive therapy upon application to a court.22    (a) (Blank).23    (a-5) Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 2-107 of 24this Code, psychotropic medication and electroconvulsive 25therapy may be administered to an adult recipient of services   HB5329 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 20662 KTG 34160 b1on an inpatient or outpatient basis without the informed 2consent of the recipient under the following standards:3        (1) Any person 18 years of age or older, including any 4    guardian, may petition the circuit court for an order 5    authorizing the administration of psychotropic medication 6    and electroconvulsive therapy to a recipient of services. 7    The petition shall state that the petitioner has made a 8    good faith attempt to determine whether the recipient has 9    executed a power of attorney for health care under the 10    Powers of Attorney for Health Care Law or a declaration 11    for mental health treatment under the Mental Health 12    Treatment Preference Declaration Act and to obtain copies 13    of these instruments if they exist. If either of the 14    above-named instruments is available to the petitioner, 15    the instrument or a copy of the instrument shall be 16    attached to the petition as an exhibit. The petitioner 17    shall deliver a copy of the petition, and notice of the 18    time and place of the hearing, to the respondent, his or 19    her attorney, any known agent or attorney-in-fact, if any, 20    and the guardian, if any, no later than 3 days prior to the 21    date of the hearing. Service of the petition and notice of 22    the time and place of the hearing may be made upon parties 23    other than the respondent by transmitting them via 24    facsimile machine or by operation of an electronic filing 25    manager service authorized by the Supreme Court. Service 26    of the petition and notice of the time and place of the   HB5329 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 20662 KTG 34160 b1    hearing upon a respondent may be accomplished by any one 2    of the following:3            (A) Personal service.4            (B) Handing a copy of the petition and notice to 5        the respondent together with a waiver of personal 6        service. The waiver may be returned to the party 7        delivering the petition and notice. If the party 8        delivering the petition and notice to the respondent 9        does not receive the waiver, the service must be by 10        personal service.11            (C) If the respondent is confined to a mental 12        health facility, handing a copy of the petition and 13        notice to the respondent, provided the party 14        delivering the petition and notice to the respondent 15        files within 24 hours a verified statement naming the 16        party served and stating the means, place, date, and 17        time of service. If no verification of service is 18        filed before the matter is set for hearing, then 19        service must be made by personal service. to the 20        respondent or other party. Upon receipt of the 21        petition and notice, the party served, or the person 22        delivering the petition and notice to the party 23        served, shall acknowledge service. If the party 24        sending the petition and notice does not receive 25        acknowledgement of service within 24 hours, service 26        must be made by personal service.  HB5329 Engrossed- 8 -LRB104 20662 KTG 34160 b1        A petition requesting that the court authorize 2    treatment with psychotropic medication shall specify the 3    full names of the medications and anticipated range of 4    dosage that comprise such treatment. The petition also may 5    include a request that the court authorize alternative or 6    alternate treatments with psychotropic medications, but 7    only where the petition sets forth the psychotropic 8    medications and the anticipated range of dosages for each 9    alternative or alternate and each combination of 10    psychotropic medications that may be administered 11    simultaneously. 12        The petition may include a request that the court 13    authorize such testing and procedures as may be essential 14    for the safe and effective administration of the 15    psychotropic medication or electroconvulsive therapy 16    sought to be administered, but only where the petition 17    sets forth the specific testing and procedures sought to 18    be administered.19        If a hearing is requested to be held immediately 20    following the hearing on a petition for involuntary 21    admission, then the notice requirement shall be the same 22    as that for the hearing on the petition for involuntary 23    admission, and the petition filed pursuant to this Section 24    shall be filed with the petition for involuntary 25    admission.26        (2) The court shall hold a hearing within 7 days of the   HB5329 Engrossed- 9 -LRB104 20662 KTG 34160 b1    filing of the petition. The People, the petitioner, or the 2    respondent shall be entitled to a continuance of up to 7 3    days as of right. An additional continuance of not more 4    than 7 days may be granted to any party (i) upon a showing 5    that the continuance is needed in order to adequately 6    prepare for or present evidence in a hearing under this 7    Section or (ii) under exceptional circumstances. The court 8    may grant an additional continuance not to exceed 21 days 9    when, in its discretion, the court determines that such a 10    continuance is necessary in order to provide the recipient 11    with an examination pursuant to Section 3-803 or 3-804 of 12    this Act, to provide the recipient with a trial by jury as 13    provided in Section 3-802 of this Act, or to arrange for 14    the substitution of counsel as provided for by the 15    Illinois Supreme Court Rules. The hearing shall be 16    separate from a judicial proceeding held to determine 17    whether a person is subject to involuntary admission but 18    may be heard immediately preceding or following such a 19    judicial proceeding and may be heard by the same trier of 20    fact or law as in that judicial proceeding.21        (3) Unless otherwise provided herein, the procedures 22    set forth in Article VIII of Chapter III of this Act, 23    including the provisions regarding appointment of counsel, 24    shall govern hearings held under this subsection (a-5).25        (4) Psychotropic medication and electroconvulsive 26    therapy may be administered to the recipient if and only   HB5329 Engrossed- 10 -LRB104 20662 KTG 34160 b1    if it has been determined by clear and convincing evidence 2    that: all of the following factors are present. In 3    determining whether a person meets the criteria specified 4    in the following paragraphs (A) through (G), the court may 5    consider evidence of the person's history of serious 6    violence, repeated past pattern of specific behavior, 7    actions related to the person's illness, or past outcomes 8    of various treatment options.9            (A) That the recipient has a serious mental 10        illness or developmental disability; .11            (B) That because of said mental illness or 12        developmental disability, the recipient currently 13        exhibits any one of the following: (i) deterioration 14        of his or her ability to function, as compared to the 15        recipient's ability to function prior to the current 16        onset of symptoms of the mental illness or disability 17        for which treatment is presently sought, (ii) 18        suffering, or (iii) threatening behavior; .19            (C) That the illness or disability has existed for 20        a period marked by the continuing presence of the 21        symptoms set forth in item (B) of this subdivision (4) 22        or the repeated episodic occurrence of these 23        symptoms; .24            (D) That the benefits of the treatment outweigh 25        the harm; .26            (E) That the recipient lacks the capacity to make   HB5329 Engrossed- 11 -LRB104 20662 KTG 34160 b1        a reasoned decision about the treatment; .2            (F) That other less restrictive services have been 3        explored and found inappropriate; and .4            (G) if If the petition seeks authorization for 5        testing and other procedures, that such testing and 6        procedures are essential for the safe and effective 7        administration of the treatment.8        (4.5) In determining whether there is clear and 9    convincing evidence, the court may consider evidence 10    presented, if any, about a recipient's history of serious 11    violence, repeated past pattern of specific behavior 12    related to the recipient's illness, or outcomes of past 13    treatments. 14        (5) In no event shall an order issued under this 15    Section be effective for more than 90 days. A second 16    90-day period of involuntary treatment may be authorized 17    pursuant to a hearing that complies with the standards and 18    procedures of this subsection (a-5). Thereafter, 19    additional 180-day periods of involuntary treatment may be 20    authorized pursuant to the standards and procedures of 21    this Section without limit. If a new petition to authorize 22    the administration of psychotropic medication or 23    electroconvulsive therapy is filed at least 15 days prior 24    to the expiration of the prior order, and if any 25    continuance of the hearing is agreed to by the recipient, 26    the administration of the treatment may continue in   HB5329 Engrossed- 12 -LRB104 20662 KTG 34160 b1    accordance with the prior order pending the completion of 2    a hearing under this Section.3        (6) An order issued under this subsection (a-5) shall 4    designate the persons authorized to administer the 5    treatment under the standards and procedures of this 6    subsection (a-5). Those persons shall have complete 7    discretion not to administer any treatment authorized 8    under this Section. The order shall also specify the 9    medications and the anticipated range of dosages that have 10    been authorized and may include a list of any alternative 11    medications and range of dosages deemed necessary. In 12    addition, the order may authorize the administration of 13    any alternative or alternate treatment that is requested 14    in the petition and for which the court finds clear and 15    convincing evidence that the benefits of the alternative 16    or alternate treatment outweigh the harm and the recipient 17    lacks the capacity to make a reasoned decision about the 18    treatment. The medications and the anticipated range of 19    dosages for any alternative or alternate treatment that 20    the court authorizes shall be included in the order. Where 21    the simultaneous use of multiple psychotropic medications 22    is authorized, the order shall specify the combinations 23    that are authorized. 24    (a-10) The court may, in its discretion, appoint a 25guardian ad litem for a recipient before the court or 26authorize an existing guardian of the person to monitor   HB5329 Engrossed- 13 -LRB104 20662 KTG 34160 b1treatment and compliance with court orders under this Section. 2    (b) A guardian may be authorized to consent to the 3administration of psychotropic medication or electroconvulsive 4therapy to an objecting recipient only under the standards and 5procedures of subsection (a-5).6    (c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, a 7guardian may consent to the administration of psychotropic 8medication or electroconvulsive therapy to a non-objecting 9recipient under Article XIa of the Probate Act of 1975.10    (d) Nothing in this Section shall prevent the 11administration of psychotropic medication or electroconvulsive 12therapy to recipients in an emergency under Section 2-107 of 13this Act.14    (e) Notwithstanding any of the provisions of this Section, 15psychotropic medication or electroconvulsive therapy may be 16administered pursuant to a power of attorney for health care 17under the Powers of Attorney for Health Care Law or a 18declaration for mental health treatment under the Mental 19Health Treatment Preference Declaration Act over the objection 20of the recipient if the recipient has not revoked the power of 21attorney or declaration for mental health treatment as 22provided in the relevant statute.23    (f) The Department shall conduct annual trainings for 24physicians and registered nurses working in State-operated 25mental health facilities on the appropriate use of 26psychotropic medication and electroconvulsive therapy,   HB5329 Engrossed- 14 -LRB104 20662 KTG 34160 b1standards for their use, and the preparation of court 2petitions under this Section before any such psychiatrists or 3advanced practice psychiatric nurses may petition the court or 4testify at a hearing under this Section. 5(Source: P.A. 100-710, eff. 8-3-18.) 6    (405 ILCS 5/3-611)  (from Ch. 91 1/2, par. 3-611)7    Sec. 3-611. Filing petition, first certificate, and proof 8of service. 9    (a) Within 24 hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays and 10holidays, after the respondent's admission under this Article, 11the facility director of the facility shall file 2 copies of 12the petition, the first certificate, and proof of service of 13the petition and statement of rights upon the respondent with 14the court in the county in which the facility is located. 15    (b) Upon completion of the second certificate, the 16facility director shall promptly file it with the court and 17provide a copy to the respondent. 18    (c) The facility director shall make copies of the 19certificates available to the attorneys for the parties upon 20request. 21    (d) Upon the filing of the petition and first certificate, 22the court shall set a hearing to be held within 5 days, 23excluding Saturdays, Sundays and holidays, after receipt of 24the petition. The court shall direct that notice of the time 25and place of the hearing be served upon the respondent, his   HB5329 Engrossed- 15 -LRB104 20662 KTG 34160 b1responsible relatives, and the persons entitled to receive a 2copy of the petition pursuant to Section 3-609.3    (e) For purposes of this Section, (1) a respondent is 4admitted to a mental health facility at the earlier of the 5respondent's confinement or receipt of treatment and (2) a 6respondent who is ordered discharged in accordance with 7Section 3-809 or subsection (b) of Section 3-901, or 8discharged upon notice by the facility director as provided by 9subsection (a) of Section 3-903, remains admitted to a mental 10health facility until the respondent is physically released 11from the mental health facility and thereafter physically 12enters a mental health facility. 13(Source: P.A. 98-865, eff. 8-8-14.) 14    (405 ILCS 5/3-807)  (from Ch. 91 1/2, par. 3-807)15    Sec. 3-807. Testimony. No respondent may be found subject 16to involuntary admission on an inpatient or outpatient basis 17unless at least one psychiatrist, clinical social worker, 18clinical psychologist, advanced practice psychiatric nurse, or 19qualified examiner who has examined the respondent testifies 20in person at the hearing. No administration of psychotropic 21medication or electroconvulsive therapy without the informed 22consent of the recipient may be authorized unless at least one 23psychiatrist or advanced practice psychiatric nurse who has 24examined the recipient testifies in person at the hearing. The 25respondent may waive the requirement of the testimony subject   HB5329 Engrossed- 16 -LRB104 20662 KTG 34160 b1to the approval of the court.2(Source: P.A. 101-587, eff. 1-1-20.)